Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1702YC (1) 91 jm/md H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 427A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. Notwithstanding the other provisions 3 of this section, aboveground storage tanks of any size that are 4 not attached within the meaning of subsection 3 shall not be 5 assessed and taxed as real property. 6 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION. Section 25B.7 shall not apply to 7 this Act. 8 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 9 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 11 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 12 1, 2025. 13